Utah statutes.
10-9a-703.   Appealing a land use authority's decision -- Panel of experts
for appeals of geologic hazard decisions.
(1)  The applicant, a board or officer of the municipality, or any person
adversely affected by the land use authority's decision administering or
interpreting a land use ordinance may, within the time period provided by
ordinance, appeal that decision to the appeal authority by alleging that there
is error in any order, requirement, decision, or determination made by the
land use authority in the administration or interpretation of the land use
ordinance.
(2) (a)  An applicant who has appealed a decision of the land use authority
administering or interpreting the municipality's geologic hazard ordinance may
request the municipality to assemble a panel of qualified experts to serve as
the appeal authority for purposes of determining the technical aspects of the
appeal.
(b)  If an applicant makes a request under Subsection (2)(a), the municipality
shall assemble the panel described in Subsection (2)(a) consisting of, unless
otherwise agreed by the applicant and municipality:
(i)  one expert designated by the municipality;
(ii)  one expert designated by the applicant; and
(iii)  one expert chosen jointly by the municipality's designated expert and
the applicant's designated expert.
(c)  A member of the panel assembled by the municipality under Subsection
(2)(b) may not be associated with the application that is the subject of the
appeal.
(d)  The applicant shall pay:
(i)  1/2 of the cost of the panel; and
(ii)  the municipality's published appeal fee.
